apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--

Generated semi-automatically from the Norsk ordbank.
http://www.edd.uio.no/prosjekt/ordbanken/

Grep for "todo" if you're looking for work.

Some of the stuff in this file that is still very much work-in-progress
or barely begun:

- Spelling choice pardefs, see eg. <pardef n="høyr_LR_hør">

- Multiword / separable verb experiments with "rå til" and "høyre til",
see http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Norsk#Multiword_expressions.2C_particle_verbs

- Compounding. Most noun pardefs refer to the pardefs "cp-R" and "cp-both-s",
although many of these noun pardefs have non-compounding alternatives, named
_no-cp__n instead of just __n. This needs lt-proc-j to work.


Licence: GPL only

-->
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖšŠ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/>
<sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/>
<sdef n="attr"  c="Attributive (certain proper nouns)"/>
<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
<sdef n="res" 	c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>
<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/>
<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/>
<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/>
<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/>
<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine, also utrum in nouns"/>
<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
<sdef n="un"   c="No gender"/>
<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
<sdef n="du" 	c="Dual (generation only)"/>
<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> <!-- the oblique case -->
<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/>
<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
<sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/>
<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/>
<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
<sdef n="pass" 	c="-st form"/>
<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-st verb"/>
<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/>
<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/>
<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/>
<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle (vblex/adj)"/>
<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/>
<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
<sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb/particle"/>
<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
<sdef n="posi" 	c="Positive"/>
<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/>
<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/>
<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/>
<sdef n="unc"   c="Uncountable"/>
<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/>
<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/>
<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/>
<sdef n="overskrift" 	c="Headline"/>
<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>

<sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
<sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
<sdef n="cmp" 	c="Generation only: added by transfer to say we have a compound"/>
<sdef n="cmp-split" 	c="Left part of a split compound"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>

<!-- Compounding pardefs. -->
<!-- The cmp tag may be added by transfer to sg.ind forms. Even nouns
that can't be analysed in compounds, can be generated in
compounds, and need to be able to make the sg.ind.cmp form.
Ø-ep... outputs no epenthetic if used as compound-L -->
<pardef n="no-cp\Ø">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="no-cp\Ø\S__case">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="no-cp\S\Ø__case">
<e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>      <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- These compound pardefs are for nouns that can also be analysed as
parts of compounds (if using lt-proc -e option). The
cp-(only-)L... and cp-both... ones are used for sg.ind forms, and
thus need to be able to generate the sg.ind.cmp form too -->
<pardef n="cp-R" c="cp-R, for forms that can only end compounds">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-R_S__case">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cp-only-L\Ø" c="cp-only-L, for forms that can only start compounds">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-only-L\s" c="cp-only-L, for forms that can only start compounds">
<e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>s-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cp-L\Ø" c="cp-L, for forms that can start compounds or be words on their own">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cp-both\Ø" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -Ø- in compounds, generate -Ø- if cp-L">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse both -Ø- and -s- in compounds, generate -Ø- if cp-L">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cp-both\s" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -s- in compounds, generate -s- if cp-L">
<e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="avhøyre">	 <i>av</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bønhøyre">	 <i>bøn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bønnhøyre">	 <i>bønn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forhøyre">	 <i>for</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kryssforhøyre">	 <i>kryssfor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overhøyre">    <i>over</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yt/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ubønnhøyrleg">     <i>ubønn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="opphøyr">          <i>opp</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="avhøyr"><i>av</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="forhøyr"><i>for</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="forhøyrsrett"><i>for</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><i>srett</i><par n="ep_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="kryssforhør"><i>kryssfor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty__n"/></e>
<e lm="vitneavhøyr"><i>vitneav</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="tilbehøyr"><i>tilbe</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty_\s__n"/></e>
